Hawaii statutes.
§327-39 Immunity from liability. A
person or public or private agency shall not be liable for any damage or
subject to criminal prosecution for any act done pursuant to and in compliance
with this part. [L 1967, c 240, pt of §1; HRS §327-39]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next